Wisconsin, session 2025, AB436.
do enact as follows:AB436,11Section 1. 173.44 of the statutes is created to read:AB436,2,22173.44 Adoption of dogs and cats. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB436,2,43(a) “Adoption” means the transfer of ownership of a dog or cat from a releasing 4agency to an individual.AB436,2,85(b) “Animal testing facility” means a facility that uses cats or dogs for 6research, education, testing, or other scientific or medical purposes, including 7testing done to assess the safety or efficacy of chemicals, ingredients, drugs, 8vaccines, or product formulations.AB436,2,109(c) “Breeder” means a person that breeds dogs or cats for sale or transfer to an 10animal testing facility.AB436,2,1411(g) “Releasing agency” means an animal shelter, humane society, animal 12welfare organization, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, home-based 13rescue, or other nonprofit group that provides individuals with animals for adoption 14as companion animals.AB436,2,2015(2) Requirement to transfer to releasing agency. (a) An animal testing 16facility or breeder that no longer has a need for a dog or cat in its possession that 17does not pose a health or safety risk to the public shall offer the dog or cat for 18transfer to a releasing agency for eventual adoption. The offer for transfer shall be 19open for at least 3 weeks prior to the animal testing facility or breeder effectuating 20the euthanasia of the dog or cat.AB436,3,41(b) If an animal testing facility is operated by a state agency, as defined in s. 21.12 (1) (b), or an institution of higher education, as defined in s. 39.395 (1), the 3state agency or institution of higher education may develop its own internal 4adoption program to effectuate the requirements of par. (a).AB436,3,65(c) An animal testing facility or breeder may enter into an agreement with a 6releasing agency for the implementation of the requirements of par. (a).AB436,3,97(d) An animal testing facility or breeder that acts in good faith to transfer a 8dog or cat to a releasing agency pursuant to par. (a) is not liable for civil damages for 9acts or circumstances related to or resulting from the transfer of the dog or cat.AB436,3,1410(3) Record-keeping requirements. By January 31 of the year following the 11effective date of this section .... [LRB inserts date], and by January 31 of each year 12thereafter, an animal testing facility or breeder shall submit to the department, in 13a matter as determined by the department, a report that includes the following 14information for the previous year:AB436,3,1515(a) The total number of dogs and cats it owned.AB436,3,1616(b) The total number of dogs and cats it used for research or testing.AB436,3,1817(c) The total number of dogs and cats it transferred to a releasing agency for 18the purpose of adoption.AB436,3,2019(d) The name and address of each releasing agency to which it transferred a 20dog or cat for the purpose of adoption.AB436,3,2221(e) The total number of dogs and cats that were adopted from its internal 22adoption program, if applicable.AB436,4,323(4) Penalty. (a) A person who violates this section shall be subject to a 1forfeiture not to exceed $5,000. Each violation of sub. (2) as it relates to a single dog 2or cat and each violation of the reporting requirement as it relates to a single dog or 3cat under sub. (3) is a separate offense.AB436,4,64(b) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to impose or accept any 5liability or responsibility by the state, its agencies, and the officers and employees of 6the state or its agencies.AB436,4,77